Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SCIENCE MUSEUM OF MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $950,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $950,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Science Museum of Minnesota for statewide educational initiatives and community-based exhibits that preserve Minnesota's history and cultural heritage. new text end